Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1227
Other violations; penalty.

With the exception of sections 28-1213 to 28-1226, any person who violates any other provision of sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 or rules promulgated pursuant to such sections commits a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 259.